Alabama, session 2026rs, HB543.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) For purposes of this section, the
following terms have the following meanings:
(1) CREDIT CARD. A line of credit issued by a domestic
lender or credit card bank.
(2) DEBIT CARD. A card issued by a bank in relation to
a checking or savings account authorized by law to be expended
at the discretion of the Lawrence County Sheriff's Office.
(b) To provide for convenience in making purchases of
tangible personal property or services approved by the
sheriff, the Sheriff of Lawrence County may establish
procedures to make certain purchases through the use of a
credit card or debit card issued to the Lawrence County
Sheriff's Office.
(c) The sheriff shall adopt written policy and
procedures governing the use of a credit card or debit card
which, at a minimum, shall include each of the following:
(1) A monetary limit on the amount of any individual
purchase which may be made with a credit card or debit card.
(2) A monetary limit on the total monthly amount that
may be purchased with a credit card or debit card taking into
consideration the monetary limit of the discretionary fund
used.
Page 1

used.
HB543 Enrolled
(3) Procedures to ensure that the sheriff, or his or
her designee, has sole access to any credit card or debit
card, credit card or debit card numbers, access codes, or
security codes.
(4) Procedures to keep accurate records of all
purchases made with a credit card or debit card which shall be
periodically reviewed during required audits.
(5) Procedures to ensure that all credit card or debit
card bills are carefully reviewed by the sheriff each month to
make sure that no unauthorized charges appear on the bill.
(6) Procedures to ensure that all credit card or debit
card bills are paid in full on a timely basis each month to
avoid service charges, late fees, or interest payments.
(d) The sheriff shall select a credit card or debit
card provider or providers taking into consideration each of
the following:
(1) Whether the credit card or debit card issuer
requires an annual fee for using the card.
(2) Whether the credit card or debit card issuer offers
rewards or rebates based upon purchases made using the
account.
(3) The interest rates, service charges, finance
charges, or late fees that will be assessed in the event a
bill from the credit card or debit card issuer is paid late or
the balance is not paid in full.
(4) Whether penalties or fees will be assessed against
the sheriff in the event he or she decides to terminate the
credit card or debit card.
Page 2

credit card or debit card.
HB543 Enrolled
(5) Any other consideration deemed relevant by the
sheriff.
(e) In the event a credit card or debit card provides
rewards or rebates based upon the use of the card, any rewards
or rebates earned from the card or cards shall be deposited in
the discretionary account of the Lawrence County Sheriff's
Office.
(f) The sole purpose of this section is to provide the
Sheriff of Lawrence County a more efficient method of making
payment for authorized purchases of tangible property or
services. Nothing in this section shall authorize the Sheriff
of Lawrence County to expend funds in excess of those
otherwise validly appropriated under law. Nor shall anything
in this section authorize the Sheriff of Lawrence County to
establish a debt of the Lawrence County Commission.
(g) Purchases procured by the Lawrence County Sheriff's
Office credit card shall be paid solely from the Lawrence
County Sheriff's Discretionary Fund, except for expenses
related to travel, which may be paid from the sheriff's
general fund budget, established by the county commission and
not to exceed the appropriated line item amount established
for the fiscal year in accordance with the county travel
policy.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 3

1, 2026.
HB543 Enrolled










________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate

100
101 House of Representatives
102
103 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
104 was passed by the House 10-Mar-26.
105
106 John Treadwell
107 Clerk
108
109
110
111
112
113 Senate 17-Mar-26 Passed
114
115
116
Page 4